Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.230

Prosecutions—Superior court jurisdiction—Equitable remedies.

(1) Any prosecution brought under this chapter may be instituted in any county in which the defendant or any defendant resides, or in which the violation was committed, or in which the defendant or any defendant has his or her principal place of business.

(2) The commission is hereby vested with the authority to utilize the services of the local prosecuting attorneys or special prosecutors as agreed upon by the commission and the local prosecutor for purposes of carrying out the prosecution of cases brought under this chapter.

(3) The superior courts are hereby vested with jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter, and the rules and regulations of the commission issued hereunder, and to prevent and enjoin and restrain violations thereof.

[ 1989 c 5 s 23.]